Massachusetts, session 194th, S2668.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the number of
members on the Monson select board shall be increased from 3 to 5. The select board shall
annually select a chairperson from among its members.
SECTION 2. At the first annual town election to occur following the passage of this act,
3 select board members shall be elected. The candidate receiving the highest number of votes in
that election shall serve a 3-year term, the candidate receiving the second highest number votes
shall serve a 2-year term and the candidate receiving the third highest number of votes shall
serve a 1-year term. Thereafter, as the terms of select board members expire, successors shall be
elected for terms of 3 years.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1